Hawaii, session 2026, GM1292.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Chapter 28, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended
by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately designated
and to read as follows:
"§28- Electronic smoking device and e-liquid
manufacturers; certification; directory; penalties. (a) No
later than October 1, 2026, and annually thereafter, every
manufacturer of an electronic smoking device or e-Iiquid sold in
the State, whether directly or through a dealer, a distributor,
an importer, a retailer, a wholesaler, or similar intermediary
or intermediaries, shall certify under penalty of perjury on a
form and in the manner prescribed by the department, that:
(1) The manufacturer has received a marketing granted
order for the electronic smoking device or e-liquid
from the United States Food and Drug Administration
pursuant to title 21 United States Code section 387j;
2026-1805 HB1573 SDl SMA.docx
WmEWMiiiniMIIH

Page 2 H.B. NO.
hTs
S.D. 1
(2) The manufacturer is in compliance with state laws,
including this chapter, chapter 245, and chapter 486P;

(3) The manufacturer is in compliance with federal laws,

title 15 United States Code section 376a, title 18
United States Code section 1716, and title 21 United
States Code section 331.
(b) The certification form shall separately list each
brand name; product name; category, including disposable
electronic smoking device, power unit, device, and e-liquid; and
flavor for each electronic smoking device and e-liquid that is
sold in the State.
(c) Each annual certification form shall be accompanied

(1) A copy of the marketing granted order issued by the
United States Food and Drug Administration pursuant to
title 21 United States Code section 387j; and
(2) A payment of $1,000 for each electronic smoking device
and e-liquid each time a manufacturer submits a
certification form for that product.
2026-1805 HB1573 SDl SMA.docx
IMHillHIlillHffllNgilllll

Page 3 H.B. NO.
"-3
(d) A manufacturer required to submit a certification form
pursuant to this section shall notify the department within
thirty days of any material change to the certification form,
including the denial of a marketing authorization or other order
by the United States Food and Drug Administration pursuant to
title 21 United States Code section 387j, or any other order or
action by the United States Food and Drug Administration or any
court that affects the ability of the electronic smoking device
or e-liquid to be introduced or delivered into interstate
commerce for commercial distribution in the United States.
(e) Beginning January 1, 2027, the department shall
maintain and make publicly available on the department's
official website a directory that lists all manufacturers of
electronic smoking devices and e-liquids and all electronic
smoking devices and e-liquids, including brand names, product
names, categories, and flavors, for which certification forms
have been submitted and approved by the department. The
department shall update the directory to ensure accuracy, and
shall establish a process to provide dealers, distributors,
importers, retailers, wholesalers, and other relevant parties
2026-1805 HB1573 SDl SMA.docx 3
WIDBHWIIHIIIIHIIfflni

Page 4
H.B. NO. 5^3
notice of the initial publication of the directory and changes
made to the directory.
(f) No manufacturer of electronic smoking devices or
e-liquids shall be included or retained in the directory if the
department determines that any of the following apply;
(1) The manufacturer fails to provide a complete and
accurate certification as required by subsection (a);
(2) The manufacturer submits a certification that does not
comply with the requirements of subsections (b) and
(c) (1) ;
The manufacturer fails to include with its
certification the payment required by subsection
(c) (2) ;
(4) The manufacturer sells products in the State required
to be certified under this section during a period
when either the manufacturer or the product has not
been certified and listed on the directory; or
(5) The information provided by the manufacturer in its
certification contains false information or contains
material misrepresentations or omissions.
2026-1805 HB1573 SDl SMA.docx
miinniMMHii

Page 5 H.B. NO.
^3
(g) Beginning January 1, 2027, or on the date that the
department makes the directory described in subsection (e)
available for public inspection on the department's official
website, whichever is later, electronic smoking devices and
e-liguids not included in the directory shall not be acquired,
possessed, transported, kept, sold, or offered for sale in the
State or to a consumer in the State, either directly or through
a dealer, a distributor, an importer, a retailer, a wholesaler,
or similar intermediary or intermediaries. After publication of
the directory, electronic smoking devices and e-liquids not
listed in the directory and intended to be acquired, possessed,
transported, kept, sold, or offered for sale in the State or to
a consumer in the State shall be subject to seizure, forfeiture,
and destruction or disposal, and shall not be acquired,
possessed, transported, kept, sold, or offered for sale in the
State or to a consumer in the State; provided that the cost of
the seizure, forfeiture, and destruction or disposal shall be
borne by the person from whom the products are confiscated.
(h) The following penalties shall apply to violations of
this section;
2026-1805 HB1573 SDl SMA.docx
wnwiiiiNnmiffliiiiMii

Pages H.B. NO.
""3
(1) A dealer, a distributor, an importer, a retailer, a
wholesaler, or similar intermediary or intermediaries
who acquires, possesses, transports, keeps, sells, or
offers for sale an electronic smoking device or
e-liquid in the State or to a consumer in the State
that is not included in the directory described in
subsection (e) shall be subject to a civil penalty of
$500 for each individual electronic smoking device or
e-liquid acquired, possessed, transported, kept, sold,
or offered for sale in violation of this section;
provided that;
(A) For a second violation under this paragraph
within a twelve-month period, the civil penalty
shall be no less than $750 and no more than
$1,000 per product;
(B) For a third violation under this paragraph within
a twelve-month period, the civil penalty shall be
no less than $1,000 and no more than $1,500 per
product; and
(C) For a fourth and any subsequent violation under
this paragraph within a twelve-month period, the
2026-1805 HB1573 SDl SMA.docx 6
WIIMIHMIHniilllMlini

Page?
H.B. NO.
civil penalty shall be no less than $1,500 and no
more than $2,000 per product;
(2) A manufacturer whose electronic smoking devices or
e-liquids are not listed in the directory and who
causes the products that are not listed to be
acquired, possessed, transported, kept, sold, or
offered for sale in the State or to a consumer in the
State, whether directly or through a dealer, a
distributor, an importer, a retailer, a wholesaler, or
similar intermediary or intermediaries, shall be
subject to a civil penalty of $10,000 for each
individual electronic smoking device or e-liquid
acquired, possessed, transported, kept, sold, or
offered for sale in violation of this section. In
addition, any manufacturer that falsely represents any
information required by a certification form shall be
guilty of a misdemeanor for each false representation;
(3) In an action to enforce this section, the State shall
be entitled to recover costs, including the costs of
investigation, seizure, forfeiture, destruction.
2026-1805 HB1573 SDl SMA.docx
■IIMiMHHHIIIilllffl

Page 8 1573
H.B. NO.
H.D. 3
S.D. 1
disposal^ expert witness fees, and reasonable
attorney's fees; and
(4) Any violation of this section shall constitute an
unfair method of competition and an unfair or
deceptive act or practice in the conduct of any trade
or commerce under section 480-2.
(i) Any nonresident manufacturer or foreign manufacturer
of electronic smoking devices or e-liquids that has not
registered to do business in the State as a foreign corporation
or business entity shall, as a condition precedent to having the
nonresident manufacturer's or foreign manufacturer's electronic
smoking devices or e-liquids listed or retained in the directory
described in subsection (e), appoint and continually engage
without interruption the services of an agent in the United
States to act as an agent for the service of process upon whom
all process, and any action or proceeding against it concerning
or arising out of the enforcement of this section, may be served
in any manner authorized by law. Service under this section
shall constitute legal and valid service of process on the
manufacturer. The nonresident manufacturer or foreign
manufacturer shall provide the name, address, phone number, and
2026-1805 HB1573 SDl SMA.docx
IIIHHIIIMlHHiiiil

Page 9 H.B. NO.
^^0^3
proof of the appointment and availability of the agent to, and
to the satisfaction of, the department.
(j) The department may examine all records, including tax
returns and reports under chapter 245, reguired to be kept or
filed under this chapter and chapter 245, and books, papers, and
records of any dealer, distributor, importer, retailer,
wholesaler, or similar intermediary or intermediaries of
electronic smoking devices and e-liquids in the State for the
purpose of determining compliance with this section. Every
person in possession of any books, papers, and records, and the
person's agents and employees, shall be directed and required to
give the department the means, facilities, and opportunities for
the examinations.
(k) The department may inspect the operations, premises,
and storage areas of any entity engaged in the acquisition,
possession, transportation, keeping, storage, or sale of
electronic smoking devices or e-liquids, or the contents of a
specific vending machine, during regular business hours. This
inspection shall include inspection of all statements, books,
papers, and records in whatever format, including electronic
format, contents of cartons, and shipping or storage containers.
2026-1805 HB1573 SDl SMA.docx 9
HHuminiiniiniiiiii

Page 10
H.B. NO.
""3
pertaining to the acquisition, possession, transportation,
keeping, storage, or sale of electronic smoking devices or
e-liquids, to verify compliance with this section. Every entity
in possession of any books, papers, and records, and the
entity's agents and employees, shall be directed and required to
give the department the means, facilities, and opportunities for
the examinations.
(1) If the department has reasonable cause to believe and
does believe that electronic smoking devices or e-liquids are
being acquired, possessed, transported, kept, sold, or offered
for sale in violation of this section, the department may
investigate or search the vehicle, premises, or vending machine
in which the electronic smoking devices or e-liquids are
believed to be located. If electronic smoking devices or
e-liquids are found in a vehicle, premises, or vending machine
in violation of this section, the electronic smoking devices or
e-liquids, vending machine, vehicle, or other tangible personal
property containing those electronic smoking devices or
e-liquids and any books and records in possession of the entity
in control or possession of the electronic smoking devices or
2026-1805 HB1573 SDl SMA.docx 10
HMiiiiiiinwHiiinniiini

Page 11 H.B. NO.
^3
e-liquids may be seized by the department and shall be subject
to forfeiture as provided in this section.
(m) The department may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91
necessary for the purpose of this section. Rules adopted to
implement this section shall be exempt from the public notice
and public hearing requirements of chapter 91.
(n) All payments, fees^ and penalties collected pursuant
to this section shall be deposited to the credit of the tobacco
enforcement special fund, established pursuant to section 28-15,
for administration and enforcement of this section.
(o) As used in this section;
"Dealer" has the same meaning as in section 245-1.
"Department" means the department of the attorney general.
"Distribute", "distributes", or "distribution" has the same
meaning as in section 245-1.
"Electronic smoking device" has the same meaning as in
section 245-1.
"E-liquid" has the same meaning as in section 245-1.
"Entity" means one or more individuals, a company, a
corporation, a partnership, an association, or any other type of
legal entity.
2026-1805 HB1573 SDl SMA.docx 1
liiiimiininiiiiiiiiiiiiH

Page 12 H.B. NO.
"Retailer" has the same meaning as in section 245-1.
"Sale" or "sold" has the same meaning as in section 245-1.
"Sell" has the same meaning as in section 245-1.
"Vehicle" means an automobile, airplane, motorcycle,
motorboat, or other motor-propelled vehicle.
"Wholesaler" has the same meaning as in section 245-1."
SECTION 2. This Act does not affect rights and duties that
matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were
begun before its effective date.
SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
2026-1805 HB1573 SDl SMA.docx 12
■■MinHHHIHIHIIlfflm

H.B. NO.
^3
APPROVED this 7th day of July , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1573, HD 3, SD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 23, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B.No. 1573, H.D. 3, S.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAFI
Date: April 14, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Third Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
3781